Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-1634
Revocation hearing; how conducted; decision; when final; judicial review; notice; to whom given.

If a hearing is requested pursuant to section 85-1633, it shall be conducted as provided in sections 85-1630 and 85-1631. The decision of the board shall be made as provided in section 85-1632 and shall be deemed final subject to the right of judicial review provided in the Administrative Procedure Act. If an agent's permit is revoked or conditions imposed thereon, the board shall notify the school which the agent was permitted to represent, as shown in the records of the department, in addition to the notice required to be given to the agent and any other parties to the hearing.

Laws 1977, LB 486, § 34;

Laws 1990, LB 488, § 34;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-2834;

Laws 1995, LB 4, § 34.

Administrative Procedure Act, see section 84-920.